Missouri, session 2026, HB3181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 21.110, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as section 21.110, to read as follows:
21.110. If the governor receives any resignation or notice of vacancy, or if he or she
2 is [satisfied] notified of the death of any member of either house, [during the recess,] he or
3 sheshall[, without delay,] issue a writ of election within ten daysto [supply] fillthe vacancy,
4 unless such vacancy occurs less than ninety days before the general election. An election
5 ordered under the provisions of this section shall occur within sixty days of the issuance
6 of the writ.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.